Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.285

Juvenile offender sentenced to terms in juvenile and adult facilities—Transfer to department of corrections—Term of confinement.

A juvenile offender ordered to serve a term of confinement with the department of children, youth, and families who is subsequently sentenced to the department of corrections may, with the consent of the department of corrections, be transferred by the secretary of children, youth, and families to the department of corrections to serve the balance of the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court. The juvenile and adult sentences shall be served consecutively. In no case shall the secretary credit time served as a result of an adult conviction against the term of confinement ordered by the juvenile court.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 612; 1983 c 191 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.